New York, session 2025-2026, A6794.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Paragraph (g) of subdivision 2 of section 155.05 of the 2 penal law, as added by section 4 of part O of chapter 56 of the laws of 3 2024, is amended and a new paragraph (h) is added to read as follows: 4 (g) By deed theft. A person commits deed theft when such person: 5 (i) Intentionally alters, falsifies, forges, or misrepresents any 6 written instrument involved in the conveyance or financing of real prop- 7 erty, such as a residential or commercial deed or title, with the intent 8 to deceive, defraud, or unlawfully transfer or encumber the ownership 9 rights or a portion thereof of a residential or commercial property; or 10 (ii) with intent to defraud, misrepresents themselves as the owner or 11 authorized representative of residential or commercial real property to 12 induce others to rely on such false information in order to obtain 13 ownership or possession of such real property; or 14 (iii) with intent to defraud, takes, obtains, or transfers title or 15 ownership of real property by fraud, misrepresentation, forgery, larce- 16 ny, false pretenses, false promise, or any other fraudulent or deceptive 17 practice[.]; or 18 (h) By cyber extortion. 19 A person obtains property by cyber extortion when with the intent to 20 obtain property from another person or entity located in the state of 21 New York, such person removes or otherwise remediates the impact of a 22 set of machine language instructions that restricts another person's or 23 entity's access to the other person's or entity's computer, computer 24 system, computer network, or any data therein, that is designed to modi- 25 fy, damage, destroy, record, or transmit information within a computer, EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD00522-01-5 A. 6794 2 1 computer system, or computer network or render inoperable or otherwise 2 modify such person's or entity's computer, computer system, or computer 3 network without the intent or permission of the owner of such computer, 4 computer system, computer network, or any data contained therein, here- 5 inafter referred to as malicious computer instructions, and the person 6 intended to implement and did implement such malicious computer 7 instructions, threatened to implement whether or not the person intended 8 to implement such malicious computer instructions, or, even though such 9 instructions were not implemented, stated that such malicious computer 10 instructions were implemented on the person's or entity's computer. 11 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately.